Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5772.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 27-18-69 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-18 entitled "Accident
and Sickness Insurance Policies" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-18-69. Licensed ambulance service.
(a) No individual or group health insurance contract, plan or policy delivered, issued for
delivery, or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2009 shall provide for a co-payment for
ground ambulance services in excess of fifty dollars ($50.00).
(b) As used in this section, the term “ground ambulance services” shall mean those services
provided by an ambulance service licensed to operate in Rhode Island in accordance with § 23-4.1-
6. The term excludes air and water ambulance services and ambulance services provided outside
of Rhode Island.
(c) Subsections (a) and (b) of this This section shall not apply to insurance coverage
providing benefits for: (1) hospital confinement indemnity; (2) disability income; (3) accident only;
(4) long-term care; (5) Medicare supplement; (6) limited benefit health; (7) specified disease
indemnity; (8) sickness or bodily injury or death by accident or both; and (9) other limited benefit
policies.
(d) Individual and group health insurance contracts, plans, and policies issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2026 shall provide reimbursement rates for ambulance
services equal to reimbursement rates provided by Medicare for the same medical services. For
purposes of this section, "ambulance" means any publicly or privately owned vehicle, designed,

constructed, equipped, and operated for emergency medical treatment and/or transportation of
persons who are sick or injured.
SECTION 2. Section 27-19-60 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-19 entitled "Nonprofit
Hospital Service Corporations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-19-60. Licensed ambulance service.
(a) No individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy delivered, issued for
delivery, or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2009, shall provide for a copayment for
ground ambulance services in excess of fifty dollars ($50.00).
(b) As used in this section, the term “ground ambulance services” shall mean those services
provided by an ambulance service licensed to operate in Rhode Island in accordance with § 23-4.1-
6. The term excludes air and water ambulance services and ambulance services provided outside
of Rhode Island.
(c) Subsections (a) and (b) of this This section shall not apply to insurance coverage
providing benefits for: (1) Hospital confinement indemnity; (2) Disability income; (3) Accident
only; (4) Long-term care; (5) Medicare supplement; (6) Limited benefit health; (7) Specified
disease indemnity; (8) Sickness or bodily injury or death by accident, or both; and (9) Other limited
benefit policies.
(d) Individual and group health insurance contracts, plans, and policies issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2026 shall provide reimbursement rates for ambulance
services equal to reimbursement rates provided by Medicare for the same medical services. For
purposes of this section, "ambulance" means any publicly or privately owned vehicle, designed,
constructed, equipped, and operated for emergency medical treatment and/or transportation of
persons who are sick or injured.
SECTION 3. Section 27-20-55 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-20 entitled "Nonprofit
Medical Service Corporations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-20-55. Licensed ambulance service.
(a) No individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy delivered, issued for
delivery, or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2009, shall provide for a copayment for
ground ambulance services in excess of fifty dollars ($50.00).
(b) As used in this section, the term “ground ambulance services” shall mean those services
provided by an ambulance service licensed to operate in Rhode Island in accordance with § 23-4.1-
6. The term excludes air and water ambulance services and ambulance services provided outside
of Rhode Island.
(c) Subsections (a) and (b) of this This section shall not apply to insurance coverage
LC001241 - Page 2 of 5

providing benefits for: (1) Hospital confinement indemnity; (2) Disability income; (3) Accident
only; (4) Long-term care; (5) Medicare supplement; (6) Limited benefit health; (7) Specified
disease indemnity; (8) Sickness or bodily injury or death by accident, or both; and (9) Other limited
benefit policies.
(d) Individual and group health insurance contracts, plans, and policies issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2026 shall provide reimbursement rates for ambulance
services equal to reimbursement rates provided by Medicare for the same medical services. For
purposes of this section, "ambulance" means any publicly or privately owned vehicle, designed,
constructed, equipped, and operated for emergency medical treatment and/or transportation of
persons who are sick or injured.
SECTION 4. Section 27-41-73 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-41 entitled "Health
Maintenance Organizations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-41-73. Licensed ambulance service.
(a) No individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy delivered, issued for
delivery, or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2009, shall provide for a copayment for
ground ambulance services in excess of fifty dollars ($50.00).
(b) As used in this section, the term “ground ambulance services” shall mean those services
provided by an ambulance service licensed to operate in Rhode Island in accordance with § 23-4.1-
6. The term excludes air and water ambulance services and ambulance services provided outside
of Rhode Island.
(c) Subsections (a) and (b) of this This section shall not apply to insurance coverage
providing benefits for: (1) Hospital confinement indemnity; (2) Disability income; (3) Accident
only; (4) Long-term care; (5) Medicare supplement; (6) Limited benefit health; (7) Specified
disease indemnity; (8) Sickness or bodily injury or death by accident or both; and (9) Other limited
benefit policies.
(d) Individual and group health insurance contracts, plans, and policies issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2026 shall provide reimbursement rates for ambulance
services equal to reimbursement rates provided by Medicare for the same medical services. For
purposes of this section, "ambulance" means any publicly or privately owned vehicle, designed,
constructed, equipped, and operated for emergency medical treatment and/or transportation of
persons who are sick or injured.
SECTION 5. Chapter 40-8 of the General Laws entitled "Medical Assistance" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
40-8-33. Medicaid reimbursement rate increase.
LC001241 - Page 3 of 5

Medicaid reimbursement rates for ambulance services shall be equal to reimbursement
rates provided by Medicare for the same medical services. For purposes of this section,
"ambulance" means any publicly or privately owned vehicle, designed, constructed, equipped, and
operated for emergency medical treatment and/or transportation of persons who are sick or injured.
SECTION 6. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC001241
========
LC001241 - Page 4 of 5